Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Chapter 13. Federal Crop Insurance Contributions.

Sec. 03.13.010.
Agreement with Federal Crop Insurance Corporation.

The department shall enter into an agreement with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation under which the department agrees to pay to the corporation a portion of federal crop insurance premiums paid by producers of agricultural commodities in this state.
The agreement must provide for a corresponding reduction in the federal crop insurance premium paid by those producers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 143 SLA 1984)

Sec. 03.13.020.
Amount of contributions.

Under the agreement, the department shall pay to the corporation for each covered producer an amount equal to the amount that the corporation pays for that producer under 7 U.S.C. 1508(b)(3) of the Federal Crop Insurance Act (7 U.S.C. 1501
—
1520), except as provided otherwise in this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 143 SLA 1984)

Sec. 03.13.030.
Limitation.

Thirty percent of each producer’s premium, as calculated by the corporation, on coverage of up to 65 percent of the recorded or appraised average yield, as adjusted, shall be paid by the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 143 SLA 1984)

Sec. 03.13.040.
Appropriations.

The payments to the corporation shall be made from funds appropriated from the general fund to the department for that purpose.

If for any year the amount appropriated is insufficient to fully fund the contribution required by AS

03.13.020

, the department shall allocate funds on a first come basis.

History.

(§ 2 ch 143 SLA 1984)

Sec. 03.13.050.
Definitions.

In this chapter, “corporation” means the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation (7 U.S.C. 1503).

History.

(§ 2 ch 143 SLA 1984)